Utah statutes.
63B-11-313.   Certification of satisfaction of conditions precedent --
Conclusiveness.
(1)  The commission may not issue any bond under this chapter until it finds
and certifies that all conditions precedent to issuance of the bonds have been
satisfied.
(2)  A recital on any bond of this finding and certification conclusively
establishes the completion and satisfaction of all these conditions.
